Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.090

Transmitting data to the education data center—Annual report.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2015, and at a minimum every year thereafter, the student achievement council and all institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the college bound scholarship program shall ensure data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of the college bound scholarship program is promptly transmitted to the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400 so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported should include but not be limited to:

(a) The number of enrolled students for the college bound scholarship program in seventh, eighth, or ninth grade;

(b) The number of college bound scholarship students who graduate from high school;

(c) The number of college bound scholarship students who enroll in postsecondary education, including how many enroll who graduated high school with less than a "C" average;

(d) Persistence and completion rates of college bound scholarship recipients disaggregated by institutions of higher education and by high school grade point average;

(e) College bound scholarship recipient grade point averages;

(f) The number of college bound scholarship recipients who did not remain eligible and reasons for ineligibility;

(g) College bound scholarship program costs; and

(h) Impacts to the Washington college grant program.

(2) Beginning May 12, 2015, and at a minimum every December 1st thereafter, the student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for the college bound scholarship program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the education data center shall submit to the student achievement council the data listed in this section that is submitted by institutions of higher education for the purposes of completing the annual legislative report required by this section.

(4) Beginning November 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the student achievement council shall submit a report to the higher education committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 on the data listed in this section.

[ 2023 c 174 s 3; 2021 c 283 s 4. Prior: 2019 c 406 s 45; 2019 c 298 s 3; 2015 c 244 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 174: See note following RCW 28B.118.010.

Findings—Intent—Savings—Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2021 c 283: See notes following RCW 28B.118.010.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2015 c 244 s 6: "Section 6 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 12, 2015]." [ 2015 c 244 s 8.]

Findings—2015 c 244: See note following RCW 28B.118.010.